Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF440.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2423XS (3) 91 sb/js S.F. 440 Section 1. Section 455B.392, subsection 5, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 5. Money collected by the department pursuant to this 3 section , except for moneys collected under subsection 5A, shall 4 be deposited in the hazardous waste remedial fund created in 5 section 455B.423 . Moneys shall be used in the manner permitted 6 for the fund. Moneys collected by a state agency other than 7 the department of natural resources pursuant to this section 8 are appropriated to that agency for purposes of reimbursing 9 costs of the agency for emergency response activities described 10 in subsection 1 . Moneys collected by a political subdivision 11 pursuant to this section shall be retained by the political 12 subdivision and shall be used for purposes of reimbursing costs 13 of the political subdivision for emergency response activities 14 described in subsection 1 . 15 Sec. 2. Section 455B.392, Code 2025, is amended by adding 16 the following new subsection: 17 NEW SUBSECTION . 5A. In addition to liabilities imposed 18 by this section, there shall be imposed on a person liable 19 for costs or damages under subsection 1 a fine of ten percent 20 of the total amount of costs and damages. Moneys collected 21 pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited into the natural 22 resources account created in section 461.32. Moneys shall be 23 used in a manner permitted for the account. 24 Sec. 3. Section 461.32, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 25 to read as follows: 26 1. A natural resources account is created in the trust 27 fund. Twenty-three In addition to any moneys deposited in the 28 account pursuant to section 455B.392, twenty-three percent of 29 the moneys credited to the trust fund shall be allocated to the 30 account. 31